Vermont, session 2025-2026, H768.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. chapter 42 is added to read:
CHAPTER 42. TOWING OF MOTOR VEHICLES
§ 4251. SHORT TITLE
This chapter may be cited as the “Vermont Consumer Protection Towing
Act.”
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 2 of 23
§ 4252. PURPOSE
The purpose of the Vermont Consumer Protection Towing Act is to
establish minimum standards for towing and storage services and to promote
fair and honest practices in the towing industry.
§ 4253. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Automobile club” means a legal entity that, in consideration of
dues, assessments, or periodic payments of money, promises its members or
subscribers to assist them in matters relating to motor travel or the operation,
use, or maintenance of a motor vehicle, including auto dealers and insurance
companies, by supplying services, which may include towing service,
emergency road service, and indemnification service.
(2) “Dealer” has the same meaning as in subdivision 4(8) of this title.
(3) “Drop fee” means a charge offered instead of a standard tow fee that
allows an owner or operator who arrives on the scene prior to a vehicle being
towed to stop a tow that is in process.
(4) “Emergency towing” means the towing of a vehicle due to a motor
vehicle crash, mechanical breakdown on a public highway, or other
emergency-related incident necessitating vehicle removal for public safety
with or without the owner’s or operator’s consent.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 3 of 23
(5) “Government agency towing” means the towing of government-
owned or government-controlled vehicles by the government agency that owns
or controls them.
(6) “Heavy-duty vehicle” means a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight rating of 26,001 pounds or more.
(7) “Light-duty vehicle” means a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight rating of not more than 10,000 pounds.
(8) “Medium-duty vehicle” means a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight rating of at least 10,001 pounds and not more than 26,000 pounds.
(9) “Owner” means the person to whom a vehicle is registered or to
whom it is leased, if the terms of the lease require the lessee to maintain and
repair the vehicle. For the purposes of this chapter, a rental vehicle company is
the owner of a vehicle rented pursuant to a rental agreement.
(10) “Private property towing” means the towing of a vehicle, without
the owner’s or operator’s consent, from private property where it was illegally
parked, or for which some exigent circumstance necessitated its removal, to a
nearby location.
(11) “Rental vehicle company” means any person, including a
franchisee, in the business of renting vehicles to the public.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 4 of 23
(12) “Seizure towing” means the taking of a vehicle for law enforcement
purposes, such as the maintenance of the chain of custody of evidence,
forfeiture of assets, or unpaid parking tickets.
(13) “Storage services” means storing a towed vehicle at a towing-
storage lot.
(14) “Tow truck” means a motor vehicle equipped to tow or pick up
vehicles, including damaged or disabled vehicles.
(15) “Towing company” means any person, partnership, company, firm,
or aggregation of individuals that exists to provide towing or storage services.
A towing company does not include an automobile club, dealer, or insurance
company.
(16) “Towing or storage services” means towing services or storage
services, or both.
(17) “Towing services” means towing or otherwise moving vehicles by
means of a tow truck.
(18) “Towing-storage lot” means a property used to store vehicles that
have been towed.
§ 4254. APPLICABILITY; RULEMAKING; COMPLAINTS
(a) Applicability.
(1) This chapter shall apply to any person engaging in, or offering to
engage in, the business of providing towing or storage services in Vermont.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 5 of 23
This chapter shall not apply to vehicles towed into Vermont or towed through
Vermont, provided that the tow originates in another jurisdiction.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, this chapter shall
not apply to towing and storage services by an automobile club, dealer, or
insurance company or the towing of an abandoned motor vehicle as defined in
section 2151 of this title.
(b) Regulatory authority. This chapter confers exclusive regulatory
jurisdiction over towing companies and the provision of towing and storage
services to the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(c) Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 for the administration of this chapter, including the assessment of
administrative penalties in addition to those penalties allowed under section
4265 of this chapter.
(d) Complaints. The Department shall establish a complaint mechanism
for consumers and insurers.
§ 4255. EMERGENCY TOWING
(a) Prohibitions. It is a misdemeanor for a towing company to stop or
cause an individual to stop at the scene of a crash or near a disabled vehicle for
the purpose of soliciting an engagement for emergency towing services, either
directly or indirectly, or, unless requested to perform the services by a law
enforcement officer or public agency pursuant to that agency’s procedures or
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 6 of 23
unless summoned to the scene or requested to stop by the owner or operator of
a disabled vehicle, to provide towing or emergency towing services, to move a
vehicle from a highway when there is an injury as the result of a crash, or to
accrue charges for services provided under those circumstances.
(b) Selection of towing company.
(1) The owner or operator of the vehicle being towed shall summon to
the scene the towing company of the owner’s or operator’s choice in
consultation with law enforcement or authorized municipal personnel and
designate the location where the vehicle is to be towed.
(2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply
when the owner or operator is incapacitated or otherwise unable to summon a
tow company or defers to law enforcement or authorized municipal personnel.
(3) The authority provided to the owner or operator in subdivision (1) of
this subsection may be superseded by the law enforcement officer or
authorized municipal personnel if the towing company of choice cannot
respond to the scene in a timely fashion and the vehicle is a hazard, impedes
the flow of traffic, or may not legally remain in its location in the opinion of
the law enforcement officer or authorized municipal personnel.
(c) Record of caller.
(1) If a towing company is summoned for an emergency tow by the
owner or operator of a disabled vehicle, the towing company shall record the
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 7 of 23
first name, last name, and telephone number of the individual who summoned
it to the scene and the make, model, year, color, vehicle identification number
(VIN), and license plate number of the towed vehicle.
(2) If a towing company is summoned for an emergency tow by a law
enforcement officer or designee of a public safety agency with jurisdiction, the
towing company shall record the identity of the law enforcement officer or
designee of a public safety agency with jurisdiction and the log number, call
number, incident number, or dispatch number assigned to the incident as
applicable.
(d) Visual documentation. Prior to towing a vehicle under this section, a
towing company shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation
to evidence the location of the vehicle and any damages.
(e) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain a record of the information
described in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and shall retain that
information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 8 of 23
(f) Storage. The towing company shall properly secure all towed vehicles
and make all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, weather damage, or
theft to all towed vehicles, including the vehicles’ cargo and contents.
§ 4256. PRIVATE PROPERTY TOWING REQUIREMENTS
(a) Establishment of a private tow-away zone. The owner of private
property may establish a private tow-away zone by posting a sign that is at
least 18 inches by 24 inches in size and includes a statement that the property
is a tow-away zone, a description of persons authorized to park on the
property, and the address and telephone number for where towed vehicles are
stored.
(b) Prohibition and record of caller. A towing company shall not tow a
vehicle under this section unless it receives a request for a tow. The towing
company shall record the date, time, and name of the requester.
(c) Visual documentation. Prior to towing a vehicle under this section, a
towing company shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation
to evidence that the vehicle is clearly parked on private property in violation of
a private tow-away zone. The towing company shall record the time and date
of the photographs, video, or other visual documentation.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 9 of 23
(d) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain a record of the information
described in subsections (b) and (c) of this section and shall retain that
information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(e) Location and storage.
(1) A towing company shall ensure that a vehicle towed under this
section is taken to a location that is within 25 miles of the location of the
private tow-away zone.
(2) The towing company shall properly secure all towed vehicles and
make all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, weather damage, or
theft to all towed vehicles, including the vehicles’ cargo and contents.
(f) Release of vehicle prior to towing. If the owner or operator of a vehicle
is parked in violation of a private tow-away zone and arrives while the vehicle
is being removed, the towing company shall give the vehicle owner or operator
oral or written notification that the vehicle owner or operator may pay a drop
fee for the release of the vehicle. Upon payment of that fee, the towing
company shall release the vehicle and give the vehicle owner or operator a
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 10 of 23
receipt showing both the full amount normally assessed for towing the vehicle
and the actual amount received for the drop fee.
(g) Notice. The towing company shall provide notice of the tow to law
enforcement within two hours after removing the vehicle from the private tow-
away zone.
§ 4257. SEIZURE TOWING
(a) Location and storage.
(1) A towing company shall ensure that a vehicle towed under this
section is taken to a location that is within 25 miles of the location where the
vehicle is towed from.
(2) The towing company shall properly secure all towed vehicles and
make all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, weather damage, or
theft to all towed vehicles, including the vehicles’ cargo and contents.
(b) Release of vehicle prior to towing. If the owner or operator of a vehicle
that is being towed because of unpaid parking tickets arrives while the vehicle
is being towed, the towing company shall give the vehicle owner or operator
oral or written notification that the vehicle owner or operator may pay a drop
fee for the release of the vehicle. Upon payment of that fee, the towing
company shall release the vehicle and give the vehicle owner or operator a
receipt showing both the full amount normally assessed for towing the vehicle
and the actual amount received for the drop fee.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 11 of 23
§ 4258. ESTIMATE REQUIREMENTS
(a) Estimate required. If the owner or operator of a vehicle is present at the
time and location of a tow, the towing company shall furnish the owner or
operator of the vehicle with a written itemized estimate of all charges and
services to be performed.
(b) Estimate contents. The estimate required under subsection (a) of this
section shall include all of the following:
(1) the name, address, telephone number, and motor carrier permit
number of the towing company;
(2) the license plate number of the tow truck performing the tow; and
(3) an itemized description and cost for all services, including charges
for labor, special equipment, mileage from dispatch to return, and storage fees
expressed as a daily rate.
(c) Signature required.
(1) The towing company shall obtain the vehicle owner’s or operator’s
written or electronic signature on the itemized estimate and shall furnish a
copy to the individual who signs the estimate.
(2) The requirements in subdivision (1) of this subsection may be
completed after the vehicle is attached and removed to the nearest safe
shoulder or highway if done at the request of law enforcement or a public
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 12 of 23
agency, provided the estimate is furnished prior to the removal of the vehicle
from the nearest safe shoulder or highway.
(d) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain the records required under
subsection (a) of this section and shall retain that information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
§ 4259. INVOICE REQUIREMENTS
(a) Invoice required. All services rendered by a towing company,
including any warranty or zero-cost services, shall be recorded on an invoice.
Each additional service must be set forth individually as a single line item with
an explanation and the exact charge for the service.
(b) Invoice contents. Each itemized invoice for towing costs shall contain
the following:
(1) the location from which the vehicle was towed;
(2) the storage location of the vehicle;
(3) the name, address, and telephone number of the towing company;
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 13 of 23
(4) a description of the vehicle, including the make, model, year, color,
vehicle identification number (VIN), and license plate number of the towed
vehicle;
(5) the charge for the tow; and
(6) the daily storage charge and the number of days the vehicle was
stored.
(c) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing company shall maintain the records required under
subsection (a) of this section and shall retain that information for three years.
(2) The towing company shall make the records required to be
maintained under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours
after receipt of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
§ 4260. NOTICE REQUIREMENTS
(a) Notice required. Within 24 hours after the commencement of towing,
the towing company must commence a search of the records of the Department
of Motor Vehicles to ascertain the identity of the owner and any lienholder of
the towed vehicle. Written notice shall be given directly to the owner by
registered mail within five business days after the commencement of towing,
and no storage charges beyond the initial 24-hour charge shall accrue until the
notice requirement has been met.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 14 of 23
(b) Notice contents. Notice to the owner or insurer shall contain the
following:
(1) the name, address, and telephone number of the towing company;
(2) the date and time the vehicle was towed;
(3) the location from which the vehicle was towed;
(4) the address where the vehicle is or will be stored and the address and
telephone number where payment and business transactions take place if either
is different from the address and telephone number of the towing company;
(5) the name of the tow truck operator; and
(6) a description of the vehicle, including the make, model, year, color,
vehicle identification number (VIN), and license plate number of the towed
vehicle.
§ 4261. MAXIMUM CHARGES
(a) A towing company shall not charge more than the following for towing
a motor vehicle:
(1) $125.00 for a light-duty vehicle;
(2) $275.00 for a medium-duty vehicle; and
(3) $400.00 per hour for towing a heavy-duty vehicle.
(b) The drop fee charged by a towing company shall not exceed the
following amounts:
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 15 of 23
(1) $30.00 for a light-duty vehicle;
(2) $65.00 for a medium-duty vehicle; and
(3) $150.00 for a heavy-duty vehicle.
(c) A towing company shall not charge storage-related fees in excess of the
following:
(1) for a light-duty vehicle, $20.00 per day of storage for any day that
the towing company is operating under its standard hours of operation;
(2) for a medium-duty vehicle, $30.00 per day of storage for any day
that the towing company is operating under its standard hours of operation;
(3) for a heavy-duty vehicle, $100.00 per day of storage for any day that
the towing company is operating under its standard hours of operation; and
(4) for any towed motor vehicle, $35.00 for access to the vehicle outside
the towing company’s standard hours of operation for the recovery of personal
items.
(d) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, charges for
towing an abandoned vehicle from public property shall be in accordance with
section 2158 of this title, and fees for towing or storing a vehicle pursuant to
municipal ordinance shall be as established by the municipality in accordance
with section 1753 of this title.
(e) No charge shall be made in excess of the estimated price without the
prior consent of the owner or operator of the vehicle.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 16 of 23
§ 4262. HOURS OF OPERATION
A towing-storage lot shall have, at a minimum, the following standard hours
of operation: 7:00 a.m.–6:00 p.m. on Monday–Friday, exclusive of federal and
State holidays, and on at least one weekend day.
§ 4263. RELEASE OF VEHICLE; METHODS OF PAYMENT
(a) A towing company shall release a towed vehicle to the owner or the
insurance company representative of the owner upon receipt of payment.
(b) A towing company shall only release a towed vehicle to the insurance
company representative if:
(1) the owner’s insurance company representative presents proof that the
towed vehicle is insured with the company; or
(2) the owner of the towed vehicle approves release of the towed vehicle
to the insurance company representative.
(c) The owner of the towed vehicle or insurance company representative of
the owner of the towed vehicle shall have the right to inspect the vehicle before
accepting its return.
(d) A towing company shall accept, at a minimum, cash, an insurance
check, a credit card, a debit card, a certified check, or a money order.
§ 4264. PROHIBITED ACTS
(a) It shall be unlawful for a towing company or an individual acting on
behalf of a towing company to:
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 17 of 23
(1) falsely represent, either expressly or by implication, that the towing
company represents or is approved by any private organization that provides
emergency road service for disabled motor vehicles;
(2) require an owner or operator of a motor vehicle involved in a crash
or breakdown to preauthorize one or more of the following: more than 24
hours of storage, teardown, or repair work as a condition to providing towing
services for the vehicle;
(3) charge more than one towing fee when the owner or operator of a
disabled vehicle requests transport of the vehicle to a repair facility owned or
operated by the towing company;
(4) charge more than the maximum fees as allowed under section 4261
of this chapter; or
(5) violate any other provision of this chapter.
(b) Towing companies shall not tow disabled vehicles to a repair facility
unless the owner or operator of the disabled vehicle gives written consent
before removal of the disabled vehicle.
(c) No towing company shall refuse to release a vehicle to the owner or the
owner’s insurer upon tender of full payment of an itemized invoice for all
lawful charges made in connection with the towing and storage of a vehicle.
(d) No towing company shall refuse, during the towing company’s standard
hours of operation, including prior to payment of fees and release of a towed
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 18 of 23
vehicle, the right of physical inspection of the towed vehicle by the owner or
the owner’s insurer or the recovery of personal items left in the vehicle.
(e) No towing company shall charge storage fees for any day on which
release of the towed vehicle or access to the towed vehicle by the owner or
insurer is not permitted by the towing company.
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 4265 is added to read:
§ 4265. PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT
The Department of Motor Vehicles shall investigate any suspected
violations of this chapter and any complaints of alleged violations of this
chapter that are filed with the Department and shall take all proper and
necessary remedial action to correct any violations.
Sec. 3. ENFORCEMENT OF VERMONT CONSUMER PROTECTION
TOWING ACT; REPORT
(a) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, in consultation with the Attorney
General, shall develop a proposed framework for enforcement of the Vermont
Consumer Protection Towing Act, 23 V.S.A. chapter 42.
(b) The proposed framework shall:
(1) identify any investigatory authority necessary to permit the
Department of Motor Vehicles to determine whether a violation of the Act has
occurred;
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 19 of 23
(2) provide proposed monetary penalty amounts and a process for
collecting any penalties imposed; and
(3) identify any additional authority that may be necessary to enforce the
provisions of the Act.
(b) The Commissioner shall, on or before December 15, 2026, submit a
written report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary and on
Transportation that outlines the proposed framework and identifies any
legislative action necessary to implement it.
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. § 2155 is amended to read:
§ 2155. FEES AND CHARGES
(a) Towing fees. For towing an abandoned motor vehicle from private
property, a towing service may charge a reasonable fee to be paid by the
vehicle owner or the landowner of the private property.
(b) Storage charges. In addition to any towing fee, an owner or lienholder
reclaiming an abandoned motor vehicle may be charged and shall pay a fee for
the costs of storage of the vehicle, except that no fee may shall be charged for
storage for any period preceding the date upon which the form for abandoned
motor vehicle certification is sent to the Department.
(c) Maximum fees and charges. The fees and other amounts charged
pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not exceed the
applicable amounts permitted pursuant to section 4261 of this title.
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 20 of 23
Sec. 5. 23 V.S.A. § 2156 is amended to read:
§ 2156. DISPOSAL OF ABANDONED MOTOR VEHICLES
(a) If Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, if the Commissioner issues the certificate of abandoned motor vehicle,
title to the motor vehicle shall pass to the holder of the certificate of abandoned
motor vehicle, free from all claims of the owner or prior holder of the motor
vehicle, and of all persons claiming through or under the owner or prior holder.
The Commissioner shall issue an appropriate title or salvage title of the motor
vehicle at no charge.
* * *
(c)(1) A person who has taken title to a motor vehicle pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall only be entitled to the value of the motor
vehicle up to the amount of any charges for towing and storage that are due at
the time the certificate of abandoned motor vehicle is issued. Any value in
excess of the amount due shall be reported to and delivered into the custody of
the State Treasurer pursuant to the provisions of 27 V.S.A. chapter 18.
(2) The value in excess of the amount due shall be determined as
follows:
(A) If the person who has taken title to the motor vehicle pursuant to
this section sells the vehicle within 90 days after the certificate of abandoned
motor vehicle is issued, the amount due shall be subtracted from the amount
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 21 of 23
for which the vehicle is sold, and any remaining amount shall be reported to
and delivered into the custody of the State Treasurer.
(B) If the person who has taken title to the motor vehicle pursuant to
this section does not sell the vehicle within 90 days after the certificate of
abandoned motor vehicle is issued, the amount due shall be subtracted from the
approximate value of the motor vehicle pursuant to J.D. Power Values or any
comparable publication, and any remaining amount shall be reported to and
delivered into the custody of the State Treasurer.
Sec. 6. 23 V.S.A. § 2158 is amended to read:
§ 2158. FEES FOR TOWING; PUBLIC PROPERTY; FUNDING
(a) A towing service may charge a fee of up to $125.00 for towing an
abandoned motor vehicle from public property under the provisions of sections
2151–2157 of this subchapter. This fee shall be paid to the towing service
upon the issuance by the Department of Motor Vehicles of a certificate of
abandoned motor vehicles vehicle under section 2156 of this title. The
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall notify the Commissioner of Finance
and Management who shall issue payment to the towing service for vehicles
removed from public property.
(b) The fee for towing charged pursuant to subsection (a) of this section
shall not exceed the following:
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 22 of 23
(1) $125.00 for a light-duty vehicle;
(2) $275.00 for a medium-duty vehicle; and
(3) $400.00 per hour for towing a heavy-duty vehicle.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Heavy-duty vehicle” means a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight rating of 26,001 pounds or more.
(2) “Light-duty vehicle” means a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight rating of not more than 10,000 pounds.
(3) “Medium-duty vehicle” means a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight rating of at least 10,001 pounds and not more than 26,000 pounds.
Sec. 7. RULEMAKING
(a) Unless extended by the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 843(c), the Department of Motor Vehicles shall adopt
rules required under 23 V.S.A. § 4254(c), as added by Sec. 1 of this act, on or
before June 1, 2027, to be effective July 1, 2027.
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may adopt rules as necessary to
implement the provisions of Secs. 4 and 5 of this act.
Sec. 8. 27 V.S.A. § 1474 is added to read:
§ 1474. WHEN A MOTOR VEHICLE IS PRESUMED ABANDONED
Subject to section 1469 of this title, a motor vehicle is presumed to be
abandoned when the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles issues a certificate of
VT LEG #386329 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.768
2026 Page 23 of 23
abandoned motor vehicle for that vehicle pursuant to the provisions of 23
V.S.A. chapter 21, subchapter 7.
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 2 (enforcement and penalties) shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
(b) This section and the remaining sections of this act shall take effect on
July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386329 v.3